Alaska, session 34, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 09.65.340(b) is amended to read: 06 (b) Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person who administers an 07 opioid overdose drug to another person who the person reasonably believes is 08 experiencing an opioid overdose emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting 09 from an act or omission in the emergency administration of the opioid overdose drug. 10 A person who provides and maintains an opioid overdose drug in a public place 11 for the purpose of ensuring the opioid overdose drug is readily available for 12 administration to a person experiencing an opioid overdose emergency is not 13 liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in the emergency 14 administration of the opioid overdose drug. 01 * Sec. 2. AS 18.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 02 Article 4. Lifesaving Equipment in Buildings Open to the Public. 03 Sec. 18.35.400. Automated external defibrillators and opioid overdose 04 response kits in state buildings and buildings open to the public. (a) The state shall 05 provide and maintain an automated external defibrillator and an opioid overdose 06 response kit, along with appropriate identifying signs, on each floor of each building 07 owned or controlled and held by the state for government or public use. The 08 automated external defibrillator and opioid overdose response kit must be placed in a 09 central location on each floor. 10 (b) The state shall make available free of charge to the owner or lessee of a 11 building that is open for public use 12 (1) an automated external defibrillator, along with a clearly identifying 13 sign, for each floor of the building; and 14 (2) an opioid overdose response kit, along with a clearly identifying 15 sign, for each floor of the building. 16 (c) The Department of Health shall apply for and make reasonable efforts to 17 secure federal assistance that may be available to the state to assist with the cost of 18 providing and maintaining automated external defibrillators and opioid overdose 19 response kits provided under this section. 20 (d) The Department of Health shall adopt regulations to implement and 21 enforce this section. 22 (e) In this section, "opioid overdose response kit" means a kit that contains at 23 least two doses of a drug that reverses, in whole or in part, the pharmacological effects 24 of an opioid overdose, disposable gloves, disposable face shields for rescue breathing, 25 and instructions for use. 26 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.